Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202547-1110
Parole officer; correctional officer; monitor performance; report.

(1) The department shall designate a parole officer to monitor the performance of each parole-eligible committed offender who is assigned to a community work release and reentry center. The designated parole officer shall be required to periodically report to the department on the progress of the committed offender.

(2) The department shall designate a correctional officer to monitor the performance of each committed offender who is assigned to a community work release and reentry center under subsection (3) of section 47-1104. The designated correctional officer shall be required to periodically report to the department on the progress of the committed offender.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 10;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 67.